Hawaii statutes.
[§432E-32] Notice of right to
external review. Notice of the right to external review issued pursuant to
this part shall set forth the options available to the enrollee under this
part. The commissioner may specify the form and content of notice of external
review. [L 2011, c 230, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next